Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Records

48-26-101. Corporate records.

A corporation shall keep as permanent records minutes of all meetings of its shareholders and board of directors, a record of all actions taken by the shareholders or board of directors without a meeting, and a record of all actions taken by a committee of the board of directors in place of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation.

A corporation shall maintain appropriate accounting records.

A corporation or its agent shall maintain a record of its shareholders, in a form that permits preparation of a list of the names and addresses of all shareholders, in alphabetical order by class and series, if any, of shares showing the number, class, and series, if any, of shares held by each shareholder.

A corporation shall maintain its records in written form or in another form capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time.

A corporation shall keep a copy of the following records at its principal office:

Its charter or restated charter and all amendments thereto currently in effect;

Its bylaws or restated bylaws and all amendments to them currently in effect;

Resolutions adopted by its board of directors creating one (1) or more classes or series of shares, and fixing their relative rights, preferences, and limitations, if shares issued pursuant to those resolutions are outstanding;

The minutes of all shareholders' meetings, and records of all action taken by shareholders without a meeting, for the past three (3) years;

All written communications to shareholders generally within the past three (3) years, including any financial statements prepared for the past three (3) years under § 48-26-201;

A list of the names and business addresses of its current directors and officers; and

Its most recent annual report delivered to the secretary of state under § 48-26-203.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 16.01.

Cross-References. Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Nonprofit corporations, records and reports, title 48, ch. 66.

48-26-102. Inspection of records by shareholders.

A shareholder of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at the corporation's principal office, any of the records of the corporation described in § 48-26-101(e), if the shareholder gives the corporation written notice of the shareholder's demand at least five (5) business days before the date on which the shareholder wishes to inspect and copy.

A shareholder of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at a reasonable location specified by the corporation, any of the following records of the corporation, if the shareholder meets the requirements of subsection (c) and gives the corporation written notice of the shareholder's demand at least five (5) business days before the date on which the shareholder wishes to inspect and copy:

Excerpts from minutes of any meeting of the board of directors, records of any action of a committee of the board of directors while acting in place of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation, minutes of any meeting of the shareholders, and records of action taken by the shareholders or board of directors without a meeting, to the extent not subject to inspection under subsection (a);

Accounting records of the corporation; and

The record of shareholders.

A shareholder may inspect and copy the records described in subsection (b) only if:

The shareholder's demand is made in good faith and for a proper purpose;

The shareholder describes with reasonable particularity the shareholder's purpose and the records the shareholder desires to inspect; and

The records are directly connected with the shareholder's purpose.

The right of inspection granted by this section may not be abolished or limited by a corporation's charter or bylaws.

This section does not affect:

The right of a shareholder to inspect records under § 48-17-201 or, if the shareholder is in litigation with the corporation, to the same extent as any other litigant; or

The power of a court, independently of chapters 11-27 of this title, to compel the production of corporate records for examination.

For purposes of this section, “shareholder” includes a beneficial owner whose shares are held in a voting trust or by a nominee on the shareholder's behalf.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 16.02; 2012, ch. 1051, § 55.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 43.

48-26-103. Scope of inspection right.

A shareholder's agent or attorney has the same inspection and copying rights as the shareholder the agent or attorney represents.

The right to copy records under § 48-26-102 includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photographic, xerographic, or other means.

The corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the shareholder. The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production or reproduction of the records.

The corporation may comply with a shareholder's demand to inspect the record of shareholders under § 48-26-102(b)(3) by providing the shareholder with a list of its shareholders that was compiled no earlier than the date of the shareholder's demand.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 16.03.

48-26-104. Court-ordered inspection.

If a corporation does not allow a shareholder who complies with § 48-26-102(a) to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available for inspection, a court of record having equity jurisdiction in the county where the corporation's principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located may summarily order inspection and copying of the records demanded at the corporation's expense upon application of the shareholder.

If a corporation does not within a reasonable time allow a shareholder to inspect and copy any other record, the shareholder who complies with § 48-26-102(b) and (c) may apply to the court of record having equity jurisdiction in the county where the corporation's principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located for an order to permit inspection and copying of the records demanded. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection (b) on an expedited basis.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it shall also order the corporation to pay the shareholder's costs (including reasonable counsel fees) incurred to obtain the order if the shareholder proves that the corporation refused inspection without a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the shareholder to inspect the records demanded.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records by the demanding shareholder.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 16.04.

48-26-105. Inspection of record by directors.

A director of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy the books, records and documents of the corporation at any reasonable time to the extent reasonably related to the performance of the director's duties as a director, including duties as a member of a committee, but not for any other purpose or in any manner that would violate any duty to the corporation.

The chancery court of the county where the corporation's principal office (or if none in this state, its registered officer) is located may order inspection and copying of the books, records and documents at the corporation's expense, upon application of a director who has been refused such inspection rights, unless the corporation establishes that the director is not entitled to such inspection rights. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection (b) on an expedited basis.

If an order is issued, the court may include provisions protecting the corporation from undue burden or expense, and prohibiting the director from using information obtained upon exercise of the inspection rights in a manner that would violate a duty to the corporation, and may also order the corporation to reimburse the director for the director's expenses incurred in connection with the application.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 56.

48-26-106. Exception to notice requirements.

Whenever notice would otherwise be required to be given under chapters 11-27 of this title to a shareholder, such notice need not be given if:

Notices to shareholders of two (2) consecutive annual meetings, and all notices of meetings during the period between such two (2) consecutive annual meetings, have been sent to such shareholder at such shareholder's address as shown on the records of the corporation and have been returned undeliverable and could not be delivered; or

All, but not less than two (2), payments of dividends on securities during a twelve-month period, or two (2) consecutive payments of dividends on securities during a period of more than twelve (12) months, have been sent to such shareholder at such shareholder's address as shown on the records of the corporation and have been returned undeliverable or could not be delivered.

If any such shareholder delivers to the corporation a written notice setting forth such shareholder's then current address, the requirement that notice be given to such shareholder shall be reinstated.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 56.